Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1952
Special meeting.

(a) A corporation with members shall hold a special meeting of members:

(1) On call of its board or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles or bylaws; or

(2) Except as provided in the articles or bylaws of a religious corporation if the holders of at least five percent of the voting power of any corporation sign, date, and deliver to any corporate officer one or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held.

(b) The close of business on the thirtieth day before delivery of the demand or demands for a special meeting to any corporate officer is the record date for the purpose of determining whether the five percent requirement of subsection (a) of this section has been met.

(c) If a notice for a special meeting demanded under subdivision (a)(2) of this section is not given pursuant to section 21-1955 within thirty days after the date the written demand or demands are delivered to a corporate officer, regardless of the requirements of subsection (d) of this section, a person signing the demand or demands may set the time and place of the meeting and give notice pursuant to section 21-1955.

(d) Special meetings of members may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office. Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, members may participate in a special meeting of the members or conduct the meeting through the use of any means of communication by which all members participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A member participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present at the meeting.

(e) Only those matters that are within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by section 21-1955 may be conducted at a special meeting of members.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 52.